Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1073
Licensure as temporary practitioner; requirements.

An applicant for licensure as a temporary practitioner shall show evidence that his or her completed application for regular licensure has been accepted by the department, that he or she has not failed any portion of the licensure examination, and that he or she has been accepted for work in a licensed cosmetology establishment under the supervision of a licensed practitioner.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 65;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,104;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 335;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 22.